South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S151.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 37, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-37-221. (A) For the purposes of this section, "small business" means a commercial retail service, industry entity, or nonprofit corporation, including affiliates, that: (1) is registered, incorporated, and headquartered in this State; (2) the business' ownership is comprised of residents of this State who pay income taxes in this State; (3) is independently owned and operated; and (4) employs fewer than one hundred full-time employees or has gross annual sales or program service revenues of less than ten million dollars. (B) In addition to the exemptions provided in Section 12-37-220(A) and (B), the first thirty thousand dollars of the fair market value of a small business is exempt from county, municipal, school, and special assessment real estate property taxes. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----